Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 8 Regulation of Blasting Operations Generally

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations for explosives and blasting agents, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Comptroller General, Safety Fire Commissioner, Chapter 120-3-10.

25-8-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Blasting Standards Act of 1978.”

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 1.

25-8-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Blaster” means a person qualified by reason of training, knowledge, or experience to fire or detonate explosives in blasting operations and who has in his possession a valid blaster’s license issued by the Commissioner.

“Blasting operation” means the use of explosives in the blasting of stone, rock, ore, or any other natural formation or in any construction or demolition work but shall not include the use of explosives in agricultural operations and private and personal use of explosives in remote areas for such operations as ditching, land clearing, destruction of beaver dams and other such operations when not in close proximity to adjacent property. This chapter shall not apply to any blasting operation in which the charge weight is 200 pounds or less.

“Charge weight” means the total weight in pounds of an explosive charge.

“Charge weight per delay” means the weight in pounds of an explosive charge which is detonated per delay period for delay intervals of eight milliseconds or greater or the total weight of explosives in pounds which is detonated within an interval less than eight milliseconds.

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Delay initiation” means the detonation of the subcharge of explosives in predetermined sequence which is accomplished by using regular or short period delay electric blasting caps or other means of equivalent effectiveness.

“Delay period” means the time interval in milliseconds (eight milliseconds or greater) between successive detonations of subchargers produced by the delay devices used.

“Distance” means the actual distance in feet along ground contour to the nearest house, public building, school, church, or commercial or institutional building normally occupied.

“Explosives” means any chemical compound or other substance or mechanical system intended for the purpose of producing an explosion or containing oxidizing and combustible units or other ingredients in such proportions or quantities that ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by detonator may produce an explosion capable of causing injury to persons or damage to property.

“Particle velocity” means the velocity with which an earth particle moves when vibrating or oscillating in any manner from its position of rest or elastic equilibrium.

“Person” means any individual, public or private corporation, political subdivision, government agency, municipality, industry, partnership, association, firm, trust, estate, or other entity whatsoever.

“Scaled distance” or “Ds” means the actual distance (D) in feet divided by the square root of the maximum charge weight (W) in pounds that is detonated per delay period. This means:

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Display Image

Ds = D
UNHANDLEDCHAR W

Scaled distance = Actual distance
UNHANDLEDCHAR charge weight per delay interval

FORMULA

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 25.

25-8-3.
Requirements governing use of explosives in blasting generally.

The use of explosives for the purpose of blasting in the neighborhood of any public highway, railroad, airport, dwelling house, public building, school, church, commercial or institutional building, or pipeline shall be done in accordance with this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner.

In all blasting operations, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the maximum particle velocity of any component of ground motion recorded on a three-component seismograph (where the components — transverse, vertical, and longitudinal — are arranged mutually perpendicular) shall not exceed two inches per second at the location of any dwelling house, public building, school, church, or commercial or institutional building normally occupied.

Blasting operations without instrumentation will be considered as being within the limits set forth in this Code section if such blasting operations are conducted in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section.

Any blasting operation may be conducted without reference to any maximum amount or period provided by this Code section if the person in charge of the blasting operation demonstrates by instrumentation that maximum particle velocity of any component of the ground motion does not exceed the limits provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

Instrumentation for determining particle velocity of ground motion, as set forth in this chapter, shall be limited to devices that conform with design criteria for portable seismographs as found in the United States Bureau of Mines, RI-6487 and United States Bureau of Mines Bulletin 656. The instrument should have calibration traceable to the United States Bureau of Standards. The Commissioner or his duly authorized agent may enter upon premises for the purpose of observing any necessary instrumentation provided by this chapter.

When blasting operations, other than those conducted at a fixed site as a part of any industry or business operated at the site, are to be conducted within close proximity to a known pipeline, the blaster or person in charge of the blasting operations shall take reasonable precautionary measures for the protection of the line and shall notify the owner of the line or his agent that the blastings are intended.

Blasting operations shall not be conducted within close proximity to any public highway unless reasonable precautionary measures are taken to safeguard the public.

When blasting operations are conducted at the immediate location of any dwelling house, public building, school, church, or commercial or institutional building which would result in ground vibrations having a particle velocity exceeding the limits provided by this chapter, such blasting operations may proceed after the receipt of written consent from the property owner or owners affected.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 3.

25-8-4.
Blasting standards; formulas and tables.

In all blasting operations, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the maximum peak particle velocity of any component of ground motion recorded on a three-component seismograph (where the components — transverse, vertical, and longitudinal — are arranged mutually perpendicular) shall not exceed two inches per second at the location of any dwelling house, public building, school, church, or commercial or institutional building normally occupied.

For blast-to-structure distance greater than 300 feet, the standard table for maximum charge per delay shall be generated by the formula:

Click to view

Click to view

where W is the weight of explosive in pounds and D is the distance in feet to the nearest dwelling house, public building, school, church, or commercial or institutional building normally occupied.

Click to view

The following table may be used for determining the weight of explosives to be used with a single delay period:

Click to view

For nontabulated distances of over 300 feet, the following formula shall be used:

Click to view

Click to view

Click to view

Display Image

W = ( D )² 50

FORMULA

STANDARD TABLE OF DISTANCE Distance in Feet Weight in Pounds Distance in Feet Weight in Pounds 0-10 1/8 350 49 11-15 1/4 400 64 16-20 1/2 500 100 21-25 3/4 600 144 26-30 1.00 700 196 40 2.25 800 256 50 3.50 900 324 60 4.75 1000 400 70 6.00 1100 484 80 7.25 1200 576 90 8.50 1300 676 100 9.75 1400 784 110 11.0 1500 900 130 13.5 1600 1024 150 16.0 1700 1156 170 18.5 1800 1296 190 21.0 1900 1444 210 23.5 2000 1600 230 26.0 2500 2500 250 28.5 3000 3600 270 31.0 3500 4900 290 33.5 4000 6400 300 34.75 4500 8100

Display Image

W = ( Distance )² 50

FORMULA

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 4.

25-8-5.
Use of seismograph measurements.

Seismograph measurements may be used to increase the charge weight per delay period, provided that the velocity limit of two inches per second of any of the three mutually perpendicular components of ground motion is not exceeded.

Seismograph measurements must be used in each individual blasting operation in which the standard table of distance is not being complied with. Notwithstanding the foregoing, a modified table for blasting operations may be established for use at a particular site, provided that the velocity limit of two inches per second of any of the three mutually perpendicular components of ground motion is not exceeded. Blasting operations without instrumentation will be considered as being within the limits set forth in this subsection if, at a specified location on at least five blasts, instrumentation has shown that the maximum peak particle velocity of any of the three mutually perpendicular components of ground motion at the specified location is 50 percent or less than the limit set forth in this subsection, provided that on all future blasts the scaled distance is equal to or greater than the scaled distance for the instrumented blast.

In estimating the maximum peak particle velocity at a particular position, the following formula shall be used:

5

D!

V = V ! _______________

D

where V!
is the maximum ground particle velocity at the seismograph, D!
is the distance of the seismograph from the blasting, and D is the distance from the blasting to the position in question and in the same general direction. The distance D!
may not be greater than D, and D cannot be more than five times D! . This determined velocity at the site of any dwelling house, public building, school, church, or commercial or institutional building normally occupied shall not exceed the two inches per second limit.

Click to view

FORMULA

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 5.

25-8-6.
License requirement.

Every person engaged in any use of explosives regulated by this chapter shall be licensed in accordance with the provisions of Code Section 25-2-17.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 6; Ga. L. 1994, p. 728, § 1.

25-8-7.
Refusal, suspension, or revocation of license.

Issuance of a license for the use of explosives may be refused or such a license which has been duly issued may be suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused by the Commissioner if the Commissioner finds that the applicant for or the holder of the license:

Has violated any provision of this chapter or of any other law of this state or any regulation duly promulgated by the Commissioner;

Has intentionally misrepresented or concealed any material fact in the application for the license or any document filed in support thereof;

Has permitted any person in his or her employ, either by direct instruction or by reasonable implication, to violate this chapter;

Has been convicted of a felony by final judgment in any state or federal court;

Has failed to comply with or has violated any proper order, rule, or regulation issued by the Commissioner; or

Has otherwise shown a lack of trustworthiness or lack of competence to act as a blaster.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 728, § 2.

25-8-8.
Maintenance of blasting records.

A record of each blast shall be kept. All records, including seismograph reports, shall be retained at least three years and shall be available for inspection.

All records kept pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall contain the following minimum data:

The name of the company or contractor;

The location, date, and time of the blast;

The name, signature, and license number of the blaster in charge;

The type of material blasted;

The number of holes, burden, and spacing;

The diameter and depth of holes;

The types of explosives used (trade name);

The total weight of explosives used;

The maximum weight of explosives and maximum number of holes per delay interval of eight milliseconds or greater;

The method of firing;

The direction and distance in feet to the nearest dwelling house, public building, school, church, or commercial or institutional building normally occupied, neither owned nor leased by the person conducting the blasting;

The weather conditions;

The type and height or length of stemming;

The type of delay blasting caps used and the delay periods used (trade name); and

Whether or not mats or other forms of protection were used.

The person taking the seismograph reading shall accurately indicate:

The location of each seismograph used and its distance from the blast;

The name of the person and firm, if any, analyzing the seismograph record;

The name of the person operating the seismograph; and

The exact location of blast relative to grid, station number, or permanent location.

It shall be unlawful for any person to make a false entry in any record required to be kept pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 8.

25-8-9.
Promulgation of rules and regulations by Commissioner; forms.

The Commissioner may promulgate such rules and regulations, neither inconsistent nor contradictory with this chapter, as he deems necessary to effectuate this chapter. The Commissioner may also prescribe the forms required for the administration of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 9.

25-8-10.
Approval by Commissioner of variations from requirements of chapter.

The Commissioner may approve variations from the requirements of this chapter when he finds that an emergency exists and that the proposed variations from the specific requirements are necessary, will not hinder the effective administration of this chapter, and will not be contrary to any other applicable law, either state or federal.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 10.

25-8-11.
Powers of Commissioner for enforcement of chapter, rules, and regulations generally; privileged nature of evidence submitted to Commissioner.

Whenever it appears to the Commissioner, either upon investigation or otherwise, that any person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in any act, practice, or transaction which is prohibited by this chapter or by any rule, regulation, or order of the Commissioner promulgated or issued pursuant to this chapter or which is declared to be unlawful under this chapter, the Commissioner, in his discretion and if he deems it to be appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of the citizens of this state, may issue an order prohibiting the person from continuing the act, practice, or transaction.

Other powers granted to the Commissioner for the enforcement of this chapter include, but are not limited to, the following:

The Commissioner may institute actions or other legal proceedings in any superior court of proper venue. Thereupon, the superior court, among other appropriate relief, may issue injunctions restraining persons and those acting in active concert with them from engaging in acts prohibited by the Commissioner in the enforcement of this chapter;

In addition to any other penalties provided in this chapter, the Commissioner shall have authority to place a licensee on probation for a period of time not to exceed one year or to impose a monetary fine of up to $1,000.00, or to do both, for each and every violation of this chapter or of the rules and regulations or orders of the Commissioner promulgated pursuant thereto; and

The Commissioner or his designee shall have investigatorial powers and shall be empowered to subpoena witnesses and to examine them under oath.

All testimony, documents, and other evidence required to be submitted to the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall be privileged.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 11.

25-8-12.
Penalties for violations of chapter, rules, regulations, or orders.

Any person who violates this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order promulgated by the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 and not more than $1,000.00.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1624, § 12.